Utah statutes.
63A-11-102.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Child welfare case" means a proceeding under Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings or Part 5, Termination of Parental Rights Act.

(2)  "Contracted parental defense attorney" means a parental defense attorney who is under contract with the department to provide parental defense in child welfare cases.

(3)  "Fund" means the Child Welfare Parental Defense Fund established in Section 63A-11-203.

(4)  "Parental defense attorney" means an attorney, law firm, or group of attorneys who:

(a)  are authorized to practice law in Utah; and

(b)  provide legal representation under contract with the department, or a county in the state, to a parent who is a party in a child welfare case.

(5)  "Program" means the Child Welfare Parental Defense Program created in Section 63A-11-103.

